src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
!! Verb inflection
!  ---------------
!! The Southern Puget Sound Salish language verbs inflect time, person and aspect.
! (cf. Hagiwara :7)
! +OcSg1:%>c
! +OcSg2:%>cid
! +OcPl1:%>ubuɬ
! +OcPl2:%>ubuɬəd
! +Oc3:%>d
! +Refl:%>cut
! +Recip:%>agʷəl
! +Mid:%>əb
!

!LEXICON COP_
!+Cop:	# ;

!LEXICON TV_BECHDUB
!+TV: 0V_BECHDUB ;
LEXICON V_BECHDUB
 0V_BECHDUB ;
LEXICON 0V_BECHDUB
!! bəčdub:bəčd
+Der/Red2_3L:%^Red123123 0V_BECHDUB_01 ;
 0V_BECHDUB_01 ;
LEXICON 0V_BECHDUB_01
!! bəčdub:bəčd
@U.TAM-SUBJ.SUBJ@+Mod/Subj:@U.TAM-SUBJ.SUBJ@ 0V_BECHDUB_02 ;
@U.TAM-SUBJ.ZERO@ 0V_BECHDUB_02 ;

LEXICON 0V_BECHDUB_02
@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@+Hab:@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@ 0V_BECHDUB_03 ;
@U.TAM-HAB.IRR@+Irr:@U.TAM-HAB.IRR@ 0V_BECHDUB_03 ;
@U.TAM-HAB.ZERO@ 0V_BECHDUB_03 ;

LEXICON 0V_BECHDUB_03
@U.TAM-RE.RE@+Anew:@U.TAM-RE.RE@ 0V_BECHDUB_04 ;
@U.TAM-RE.ZERO@ 0V_BECHDUB_04 ;

LEXICON 0V_BECHDUB_04
@U.TAM-T.REM@+RemPst:@U.TAM-T.REM@ 0V_BECHDUB_05 ;
@U.TAM-T.ZERO@ 0V_BECHDUB_05 ;
!@D.TAM-T@ 0V_BECHDUB_05 ;

LEXICON 0V_BECHDUB_05
@U.TAM-A.STAT@+Asp/Stat:@U.TAM-A.STAT@ 0V_BECHDUB_06 ;
@U.TAM-A.PROG@+Asp/Prog:@U.TAM-A.PROG@ 0V_BECHDUB_06 ;
@U.TAM-A.PROGSTAT@+Asp/ProgStat:@U.TAM-A.PROGSTAT@ 0V_BECHDUB_06 ;
@U.TAM-A.PFV@+Asp/Pfv:@U.TAM-A.PFV@ 0V_BECHDUB_06 ;
@U.TAM-A.ZERO@ 0V_BECHDUB_06 ;!2025-06-16 ?Asp/None
!@D.TAM-A@ 0V_BECHDUB_06 ;

LEXICON 0V_BECHDUB_06
@U.NMZ.V2N@+Vnoun:@U.NMZ.V2N@ OC1/2_š_OR_OCSP3_OR_DVN-POSS ;
@U.NMZ.V2A@+Ptc:@U.NMZ.V2A@ OC1/2_š_OR_OCSP3_OR_DVN-POSS ;
@U.NMZ.ZERO@ OC1/2_š_OR_OCSP3_OR_DVN-POSS ;

LEXICON TV_HUYTXW
 V_HUYTXW ;
LEXICON V_HUYTXW !CHECKME 2024-01-23
 V_BECHDUB ;
:xʷ 0V_KWEDAD ;

LEXICON V_HUY !CHECKME 2024-02-24
: 0V_KWEDAD ;

LEXICON V_IN_ID !CHECKME 2024-06-15
: 0V_KWEDAD ;

LEXICON V_KWEDYID_Dial/-NL
+Dial/-NL: V_KWEDYID ;
LEXICON V_KWEDYID ! kʷədšid+V:kʷədšíd
+Dat: V_KWEDAD ;

LEXICON V_CUTEB_Dial/-NL
+Dial/-NL: V_CUTEB ;
LEXICON V_CUTEB !CHECKME 2024-01-24
: 0V_KWEDAD ;

LEXICON TV_SELPED !səlpəd:səlpəd
: 0V_KWEDAD ;

LEXICON V_SELPED !səlpəd:səlpəd
: 0V_KWEDAD ;

LEXICON V_KWEDAD_Dial/-NL
+Dial/-NL: V_KWEDAD ;
!LEXICON TV_KWEDAD
!+TV: 0V_KWEDAD ;
LEXICON V_KWEDAD
: 0V_KWEDAD ;


LEXICON 0V_KWEDAD
!! kʷədad:kʷədad
+Der/Red2_3L:%^RedPL123123 0V_KWEDAD_01a ;
+Der/Dimin_12123:%^Red12123 0V_KWEDAD_01a ;
+Der/Dimin_1i123:%^Red1i123 0V_KWEDAD_01a ;
+Der/Dimin_12q123:%^Red12q123 0V_KWEDAD_01a ;
+Der/Dimin_1iq123:%^Red1iq123 0V_KWEDAD_01a ;
+Der/Dimin_1213:%^Red1213 0V_KWEDAD_01a ;
+Der/Dimin_1i13:%^Red1i13 0V_KWEDAD_01a ;
+Der/Dimin_12q13:%^Red12q13 0V_KWEDAD_01a ;
+Der/Dimin_1iq13:%^Red1iq13 0V_KWEDAD_01a ;
0V_KWEDAD_01a ;
LEXICON 0V_KWEDAD_01a
 0V_KWEDAD_01b ;
+Pass:%^Pen%^RmVOW%^d2t%>əb 0V_HELHED_01b ;

LEXICON 0V_KWEDAD_01b
!! kʷədad:kʷədad
! @U.TAM-A.PRF@
@U.TAM-SUBJ.SUBJ@+Mod/Subj:@U.TAM-SUBJ.SUBJ@ 0V_KWEDAD_02 ;
@U.TAM-SUBJ.ZERO@ 0V_KWEDAD_02 ;

LEXICON 0V_KWEDAD_02
@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@+Hab:@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@ 0V_KWEDAD_03 ;
@U.TAM-HAB.IRR@+Irr:@U.TAM-HAB.IRR@ 0V_KWEDAD_03 ;
@U.TAM-HAB.ZERO@ 0V_KWEDAD_03 ;

LEXICON 0V_KWEDAD_03
@U.TAM-RE.RE@+Anew:@U.TAM-RE.RE@ 0V_KWEDAD_04 ;
@U.TAM-RE.ZERO@ 0V_KWEDAD_04 ;

LEXICON 0V_KWEDAD_04
@U.TAM-T.REM@+RemPst:@U.TAM-T.REM@ 0V_KWEDAD_05 ;
@U.TAM-T.ZERO@ 0V_KWEDAD_05 ;
!@D.TAM-T@ 0V_KWEDAD_05 ;

LEXICON 0V_KWEDAD_05
@U.TAM-A.STAT@+Asp/Stat:@U.TAM-A.STAT@ 0V_KWEDAD_06 ;
@U.TAM-A.PROG@+Asp/Prog:@U.TAM-A.PROG@ 0V_KWEDAD_06 ;
@U.TAM-A.PROGSTAT@+Asp/ProgStat:@U.TAM-A.PROGSTAT@ 0V_KWEDAD_06 ;
@U.TAM-A.PFV@+Asp/Pfv:@U.TAM-A.PFV@ 0V_KWEDAD_06 ;
@U.TAM-A.CONT@+Asp/Cont:@U.TAM-A.CONT@ 0V_KWEDAD_06 ;
@U.TAM-A.ZERO@ 0V_KWEDAD_06 ;!2025-06-16 ?Asp/None
!@D.TAM-A@ 0V_KWEDAD_06 ;

LEXICON 0V_KWEDAD_06
@U.NMZ.V2N@+Vnoun:@U.NMZ.V2N@ OC1/2_s_OR_OCSP3_OR_DVN-POSS ;
@U.NMZ.V2A@+Ptc:@U.NMZ.V2A@ OC1/2_s_OR_OCSP3_OR_DVN-POSS ;
@U.NMZ.ZERO@ OC1/2_s_OR_OCSP3_OR_DVN-POSS ;

LEXICON AO_BASE ! Agent-oriented
@U.OBJ.ZERO@ 0V_HELHED ;

LEXICON BO_BASE ! Beneficiary-oriented
 0V_HELHED ;
LEXICON BO_BASE_NG !
+Use/NG: 0V_HELHED ;

LEXICON V_BASE
!! q̓ʷuʔ+V:q̓ʷuʔ "gather"
!! @U.TAM-A.PRF@
: 0V_HELHED ;

LEXICON V_CAU
!! ʔux̌ʷc+V:ʔux̌ʷc "go after"
!! @U.TAM-A.PRF@
+Cau: 0V_HELHED ;

!LEXICON IV_HELHED 2024-09-11
!!! q̓ʷuʔ "gather"
!!!! ʔəɬəd+V:ʔəɬəd
!!! @U.TAM-A.PRF@
!+IV: 0V_HELHED ;

LEXICON V_GEQIL_0/l !!gəqi:gəqi
!! ʔəɬəd+V:ʔəɬəd
! @U.TAM-A.PRF@
:%>%{lØ%} 0V_HELHED ;

LEXICON IV_GEQIL_0/l !!gəqi:gəqi
!! ʔəɬəd+V:ʔəɬəd
! @U.TAM-A.PRF@
:%>%{lØ%} 0V_HELHED ;

LEXICON V_HELHED
!! ʔəɬəd+V:ʔəɬəd
! @U.TAM-A.PRF@
: 0V_HELHED ;

LEXICON 0V_HELHED
+Der/Red2_3L:%^Red123123 0V_HELHED_01a ;
 0V_HELHED_01a ;
LEXICON 0V_HELHED_01a
 0V_HELHED_01b ;

LEXICON 0V_HELHED_01b
@U.TAM-SUBJ.SUBJ@+Mod/Subj:@U.TAM-SUBJ.SUBJ@ 0V_HELHED_02 ;
@U.TAM-SUBJ.ZERO@ 0V_HELHED_02 ;

LEXICON 0V_HELHED_02
@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@+Hab:@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@ 0V_HELHED_03 ;
@U.TAM-HAB.IRR@+Irr:@U.TAM-HAB.IRR@ 0V_HELHED_03 ;
@U.TAM-HAB.ZERO@ 0V_HELHED_03 ;

LEXICON 0V_HELHED_03
@U.TAM-RE.RE@+Anew:@U.TAM-RE.RE@ 0V_HELHED_04 ;
@U.TAM-RE.ZERO@ 0V_HELHED_04 ;

LEXICON 0V_HELHED_04
@U.TAM-T.REM@+RemPst:@U.TAM-T.REM@ 0V_HELHED_05 ;
@U.TAM-T.ZERO@ 0V_HELHED_05 ;

LEXICON 0V_HELHED_05
@U.TAM-A.STAT@+Asp/Stat:@U.TAM-A.STAT@ 0V_HELHED_06 ;
@U.TAM-A.PROG@+Asp/Prog:@U.TAM-A.PROG@ 0V_HELHED_06 ;
@U.TAM-A.PROGSTAT@+Asp/ProgStat:@U.TAM-A.PROGSTAT@ 0V_HELHED_06 ;
@U.TAM-A.PFV@+Asp/Pfv:@U.TAM-A.PFV@ 0V_HELHED_06 ;
@U.TAM-A.CONT@+Asp/Cont:@U.TAM-A.CONT@ 0V_HELHED_06 ;
@U.TAM-A.ZERO@ 0V_HELHED_06 ;!2025-06-16 ?Asp/None
!@D.TAM-A@ 0V_HELHED_06 ;

LEXICON 0V_HELHED_06
0V_KWEDAD_06 ;
!@U.NMZ.V2N@+Vnoun:@U.NMZ.V2N@ DVN-POSS ;
!@U.NMZ.V2A@+Ptc:@U.NMZ.V2A@ DVN-POSS ;
!@U.NMZ.ZERO@ DVN-POSS ;


LEXICON OC1/2_š_OR_OCSP3_OR_DVN-POSS
 DVN-POSS ;
 OC1/2_š_OR_OCSP3 ;

LEXICON OC1/2_š_OR_OCSP3
:ub OC1/2_š ;
 INDOCSP3 ;

LEXICON OC1/2_s_OR_OCSP3_OR_DVN-POSS
 DVN-POSS ;
 OC1/2_s_OR_OCSP3 ;

LEXICON OC1/2_s_OR_OCSP3
 OC1/2_s ;
 INDOCSP3 ;

LEXICON OC1/2_š
 OCSG1_š ;
 OCSG2_icid ;
 OCPL1 ;
 OCPL2 ;
 OCSP3 ;
 
LEXICON OC1/2_s
 OCSG1_c ;
 OCSG2_cid ;
:ub OCPL1 ;!CHECKME ub twice?
:ub OCPL2 ;
 OCSP3 ;


LEXICON OCSG1_š
@U.OBJ.1@+OcSg1:@U.OBJ.1@%>š DVN-POSS ;

LEXICON OCSG1_c ! this has a -d counter part as in Hungarian Sg3 
@U.OBJ.1@+OcSg1:@U.OBJ.1@%>c DVN-POSS ;

LEXICON OCSG2_icid
@U.OBJ.2@+OcSg2:@U.OBJ.2@%>icid DVN-POSS ;

LEXICON OCSG2_cid
@U.OBJ.2@+OcSg2:@U.OBJ.2@%>cid DVN-POSS ;

LEXICON OCSP3
@U.OBJ.3@+OcSP3:@U.OBJ.3@ DVN-POSS ;

LEXICON INDOCSP3
@U.OBJ.3@+OcSP3:@U.OBJ.3@%>xʷ DVN-POSS ;!CHECKME

LEXICON OCPL1
@U.OBJ.1@+OcPl1:@U.OBJ.1@%>uɬ DVN-POSS ;

LEXICON OCPL2
@U.OBJ.2@+OcPl2:@U.OBJ.2@%>uɬəd DVN-POSS ;

!+ScSg1:%>əd
!+ScSg2:%>əxʷ
!+ScSP3:%>əs
!+ScPl1:%>aɬi
!+ScPl2:%>ələp

LEXICON DVN-POSS
!@R.TAM@ K ;
@U.PossPx.ZERO@ K ;!CHECK 2021-07-10
@U.PossPx.Sg1@@D.OBJ.1@+Der/s+N+Sg:@U.PossPx.Sg1@@D.OBJ.1@ PXSG1 ;
@U.PossPx.Sg2@@D.OBJ.2@+Der/s+N+Sg:@U.PossPx.Sg2@@D.OBJ.2@ PXSG2 ;
@U.PossPx.SP3@+Der/s+N+Sg:@U.PossPx.SP3@ PXSP3 ;
@U.PossPx.Pl1@@D.OBJ.1@+Der/s+N+Sg:@U.PossPx.Pl1@@D.OBJ.1@0 PXPL1 ;
@U.PossPx.Pl2@@D.OBJ.2@+Der/s+N+Sg:@U.PossPx.Pl2@@D.OBJ.2@0 PXPL2 ;




! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
